Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 1 County Zoning
13-7-115. Private acts unaffected.

This part shall not be construed as repealing or modifying any provision of any private act heretofore enacted relating to the powers of any county therein designated or of any municipality therein designated, to enact zoning regulations in such county or in territory lying outside of such municipality.

Acts 1935, ch. 33, § 12; 1941, ch. 896, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 10268.12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-415.

Attorney General Opinions. There is no constitutional requirement that a zoning ordinance be adopted by a two-thirds vote of the local legislative body or in a general election, OAG 04-007, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 7 (1/16/04).

Meaning of “use permitted on review” under Tennessee zoning laws, OAG 06-142, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 164 (9/19/06).

13-7-116. [Reserved.]

No building permit shall be issued until the county building commissioner receives a copy of either a certificate of insurance or a workers' compensation policy as evidence of the existence of workers' compensation insurance.

The county building commissioner shall keep on file such copy of either the certificate of insurance or the workers' compensation policy for the life of the permit. After the building permit has expired, the county building commissioner shall return by mail the copy of the certificate of insurance or the workers' compensation policy within ten (10) working days to the person who obtained the permit.

This section does not apply to those persons who are not required by title 50, chapter 6, to obtain workers' compensation coverage, to any person who performs work on such person's own property in such person's own county of residence, or to any person who directly supervises work on such person's own property in such person's own county of residence.

Persons not required to present evidence of compliance with §§ 50-6-405 and 50-6-406 pursuant to this subsection (c) shall present or sign an affidavit which attests to their exemption from this section. A person authorized to issue building permits who issues a building permit to a person exempted from this section shall keep on file for the life of the permit such affidavit of exemption.

A person authorized to issue building permits, who in good faith accepts an affidavit of exemption, a copy of a certificate of insurance, or a copy of a workers' compensation policy shall not be liable in any criminal or civil action alleging the person obtaining the building permit was subject to §§ 50-6-405 and 50-6-406 and such person did not in fact have workers' compensation coverage. Compliance with this section shall be a rebuttable presumption that the person authorized to issue building permits acted in good faith.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1993, ch. 520, § 1; 1999, ch. 520, § 34; 2003, ch. 359, § 11.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

13-7-118. Land use plan in certain counties that are in an early action compact or in nonattainment for air quality.

This section applies to any county in the state that either is in an early action compact or is in nonattainment for air quality according to the environmental protection agency as of April 15, 2004.

Any county that qualifies under subsection (a) and whose population according to the 2000 federal census was sixty thousand (60,000) or more and the county as of April 15, 2004, did not have a land use plan, shall adopt a land use plan which states that air quality issues will be considered as part of the county-wide land use plans.

Acts 2004, ch. 901, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

13-7-119. Compiling of effective zoning ordinance and map — Zoning ordinance and map as public record — Challenge to accuracy.

Any county that has exercised zoning powers under this part shall compile its zoning ordinance and map, as amended, that is in effect so as to be able to provide any member of the public with a current zoning ordinance and map. In that county, the county legislative body shall authenticate, compile, update, keep, maintain and make available the zoning ordinance, map and all amendments as a public record. Any county zoning ordinance and map made available to the public through a compilation made pursuant to this section, whether in electronic or paper form, shall be presumed to be a true and accurate statement of the county's zoning ordinance and map.

Any party challenging the accuracy of any county zoning ordinance or map compiled as currently in effect in accordance with this section, whether in a rezoning proceeding before a county legislative body, an appeal to a board of zoning appeals, a subdivision or site plan approval proceeding before a planning commission or in any judicial proceeding, must prove the inaccuracy of the zoning ordinance or map by clear and convincing evidence.

Acts 2009, ch. 338, § 1.